Washington statutes.
RCW 35.94.020

Procedure.

The legislative authority of the city, if it deems it advisable to lease or sell the works, plant, or system, or any part thereof, shall adopt a resolution stating whether it desires to lease or sell. If it desires to lease, the resolution shall state the general terms and conditions of the lease, but not the rent. If it desires to sell the general terms of sale shall be stated, but not the price. The resolution shall direct the city clerk, or other proper official, to publish the resolution not less than once a week for four weeks in the official newspaper of the city, together with a notice calling for sealed bids to be filed with the clerk or other proper official not later than a certain time, accompanied by a certified check payable to the order of the city, for such amount as the resolution shall require, or a deposit of a like sum in money. Each bid shall state that the bidder agrees that if his or her bid is accepted and he or she fails to comply therewith within the time hereinafter specified, the check or deposit shall be forfeited to the city. If bids for a lease are called for, bidders shall bid the amount to be paid as the rent for each year of the term of the lease. If bids for a sale are called for, the bids shall state the price offered. The legislative authority of the city may reject any or all bids and accept any bid which it deems best. At the first meeting of the legislative authority of the city held after the expiration of the time fixed for receiving bids, or at some later meeting, the bids shall be considered. In order for the legislative authority to declare it advisable to accept any bid it shall be necessary for two-thirds of all the members elected to the legislative authority to vote in favor of a resolution making the declaration. If the resolution is adopted it shall be necessary, in order that the bid be accepted, to enact an ordinance accepting it and directing the execution of a lease or conveyance by the mayor and city clerk or other proper official. The ordinance shall not take effect until it has been submitted to the voters of the city for their approval or rejection at the next general election or at a special election called for that purpose, and a majority of the voters voting thereon have approved it. If approved it shall take effect as soon as the result of the vote is proclaimed by the mayor. If it is so submitted and fails of approval, it shall be rejected and annulled. The mayor shall proclaim the vote as soon as it is properly certified.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2133; 1985 c 469 s 40; 1965 c 7 s 35.94.020. Prior: 1917 c 137 s 2; RRS s 9513. Cf. 1907 c 86 ss 1-3; 1897 c 106 ss 1-4. Formerly RCW 80.48.020.]

NOTES:

Elections: Title 29A RCW.